Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-5,181
Violation; penalty.

Any person, persons, corporations, and the directors, managers, superintendents, and officers of such corporations violating the Boiler Inspection Act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1943, c. 112, § 9, p. 396;

R.S.1943, § 48-716;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 297;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 48-716;

Laws 1987, LB 462, § 18;

Laws 2007, LB226, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-736;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 17.